Illinois, session 104th, HB5764.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The End-of-Life Options for Terminally Ill 5Patients Act is amended by changing Section 70 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 22/70)7    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 8delayed effective date)9    Sec. 70. Immunities for actions in good faith; prohibition 10against reprisals.11    (a) Except as set forth in Section 65, a health care 12professional or health care entity shall not be subject to 13civil or criminal liability, licensing sanctions, or other 14professional disciplinary action for actions taken in good 15faith compliance with this Act.16    (b) If a health care professional or health care entity is 17unable or unwilling to carry out an individual's request for 18aid in dying, the professional or entity shall, at a minimum:19        (1) inform the individual of the professional's or 20    entity's inability or unwillingness; 21        (2) (blank); and refer the individual either to a 22    health care professional who is able and willing to 23    evaluate and qualify the individual or to another   HB5764- 2 -LRB104 21615 BDA 37082 b1    individual or entity to assist the requesting individual 2    in seeking aid in dying, in accordance with the Health 3    Care Right of Conscience Act; and4        (3) note, in the medical record, the individual's date 5    of request and health care professional's notice to the 6    individual of the health care professional's unwillingness 7    or inability to carry out the individual's request.8    (c) Except as set forth in Section 65, a health care entity 9or licensing board shall not subject a health care 10professional to censure, discipline, suspension, loss of 11license, loss of privileges, loss of membership, or other 12penalty for engaging in good faith compliance with this Act.13    (d) Except as set forth in Section 65, a health care 14professional, health care entity, or licensing board shall not 15subject a health care professional to discharge, demotion, 16censure, discipline, suspension, loss of license, loss of 17privileges, loss of membership, discrimination, or any other 18penalty for providing aid-in-dying care in accordance with the 19standard of care and in good faith under this Act when:20        (1) engaged in the outside practice of medicine and 21    off of the objecting health care entity's premises; or22        (2) providing scientific and accurate information 23    about aid-in-dying care to a patient when discussing 24    end-of-life care options.25    (e) A physician is not subject to civil or criminal 26liability or professional discipline if, at the request of the   HB5764- 3 -LRB104 21615 BDA 37082 b1qualified patient, the physician is present outside the scope 2of the physician's employment contract and off the entity's 3premises, when the qualified patient self-administers 4medication pursuant to this Act, or at the time of death.5    (f) A physician who is present at self-administration may, 6without civil or criminal liability, assist the qualified 7patient by preparing the medication prescribed pursuant to 8this Act.9    (g) A request by a patient for aid in dying does not alone 10constitute grounds for neglect or elder abuse for any purpose 11of law, nor shall it be the sole basis for appointment of a 12guardian.13    (h) This Section does not limit civil liability for 14intentional misconduct.15(Source: P.A. 104-441, eff. 9-12-26.) 16    (410 ILCS 22/90 rep.)17    Section 10. The End-of-Life Options for Terminally Ill 18Patients Act is amended by repealing Section 90. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect 20September 12, 2026.